Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-1413
Personnel division of Department of Administrative Services; program for state employees; report; contents.

(1) The personnel division of the Department of Administrative Services, in its discretion, may develop and implement a program for state employees receiving health insurance coverage under sections 84-1601 to 84-1615 that is similar to the shared savings incentive payment program described in section 44-1407. If the division develops and implements such a program, the division may use the State Employees Insurance Fund to make incentive payments to state employees pursuant to such program.

(2) If a program for state employees is developed and implemented pursuant to this section, then on or before July 1 of each year after implementation of such program, the personnel division of the Department of Administrative Services shall electronically report to the Legislature the following information for the most recent calendar year:

(a) The total number of incentive payments made pursuant to the program;

(b) The use of shoppable health care services by category of service for which incentive payments are made;

(c) The total amount of incentive payments made to state employees;

(d) The average amount of incentive payments made by category of shoppable health care service;

(e) The total savings achieved below the average prices by category of shoppable health care service; and

(f) The total number and percentage of state employees that participated in the program.

Laws 2018, LB1119, § 23.